Maine, session 132, LD816.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §6505-A, sub-§1-A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 81, §1, is further
amended to read:
1-A. Licensed activity. The holder of an elver fishing license or elver fishing license
with crew may fish for, take or possess elvers. The holder of an elver fishing license or
elver fishing license with crew may transport and sell within state limits elvers that the
license holder has taken. The holder of an elver fishing license with crew is liable for the
licensed activities under this subsection of an unlicensed crew member assisting that
license holder pursuant to subsection 1‑B. The license holder to whom a tag is issued or
the unlicensed crew member may empty an elver fyke net. The license holder to whom a
tag is issued may allow an individual who also holds an elver fishing license to empty the
elver fyke net of the license holder whose tag is on the net while under that license holder's
direct supervision.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 1 - 132LR1144(03)